Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-187.01
Legislative intent.

The Legislature affirms the importance of parole as a program for the supervised release of inmates making the transition from confinement to responsible citizenship. Therefor the Legislature intends that committed offenders who are eligible for parole have the opportunity to complete the final stages of their sentences on parole.

Laws 2003, LB 46, § 18.